Nebraska, session 109, LB357.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 2-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
2-1201 (1) There hereby is created a State Racing and Gaming Commission.
For purposes of sections 2-1201 to 2-1229 and section 6 of this act, commission
means the State Racing and Gaming Commission.
(2) The commission shall consist of seven members who shall be appointed
by the Governor and subject to confirmation by a majority of the members
elected to the Legislature and may, after an opportunity to be heard, be
removed for cause by the Governor. A violation by a member of the commission of
section 2-1219 or any malfeasance, misfeasance, or neglect in office shall be
considered cause for removal. No person shall be appointed to the commission,
or continue to hold that office after appointment, while holding any other
office or position under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United
States. One member of the commission shall be appointed from each congressional
district, as such districts existed on January 1, 2010, and four members of the
commission shall be appointed at large for terms as follows:
(a) The member representing the second congressional district who is
appointed on or after April 1, 2010, shall serve until March 31, 2014, and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the term of
the member representing such district shall be four years and until his or her
successor is appointed and qualified;
(b) The member representing the third congressional district who is
appointed on or after April 1, 2011, shall serve until March 31, 2015, and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the term of
the member representing such district shall be four years and until his or her
successor is appointed and qualified;
(c) The member representing the first congressional district who is
appointed on or after April 1, 2012, shall serve until March 31, 2016, and
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the term of
the member representing such district shall be four years and until his or her
successor is appointed and qualified;
(d) Not later than sixty days after July 15, 2010, the Governor shall
appoint one at-large member who shall serve until March 31, 2013, and until his
or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the term of such member
shall be four years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified;
(e) Not later than sixty days after July 15, 2010, the Governor shall
appoint one at-large member who shall serve until March 31, 2014, and until his
or her successor is appointed and qualified. Thereafter the term of such member
shall be four years and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified;
and
(f) Not later than sixty days after May 26, 2021, the Governor shall
appoint two additional at-large members who shall serve until March 31, 2025,
and until their successors are appointed and qualified. One of such members
shall have experience in the Nebraska gaming industry, and one shall have
experience in the Nebraska horseracing industry. Thereafter the terms of such
at-large members shall be four years and until their successors are appointed
and qualified.
(3) Not more than four members of the commission shall belong to the same
political party. No more than three of the members shall reside, when
appointed, in the same congressional district. No more than two of the members
shall reside in any one county. Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment by
the Governor for the unexpired term. The compensation of the members of the
commission shall be one thousand dollars per month, which may be adjusted every
two years in an amount not to exceed the change in the Consumer Price Index for
-1-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers for the period between June 30 of the
first year to June 30 of the year of adjustment. The members shall be
reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The members of the commission shall be bonded
or insured as required by section 11-201.
(4) No member shall have any personal financial interest in any licensed
racetrack enclosure or authorized gaming operator as defined in the Nebraska
Racetrack Gaming Act for the duration of the member's term.
Sec. 2. Section 2-1202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
2-1202 (1) The commission shall elect one of its members to be chairperson
thereof, and it shall be authorized to employ such other assistants and
employees as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 2-1201 to
2-1218 , and the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act , and sections 9-1201 to 9-1209.
The commission shall employ an executive director who shall be selected by the
commission subject to the approval of the Governor. The executive director
shall devote full time to the duties of the office and shall not engage in any
other business or profession or hold any other state public office. The
executive director shall keep a record of the proceedings of the commission,
preserve the books, records, and documents entrusted to the executive director,
and perform such other duties as the commission shall prescribe; and the
commission shall require the executive director to give bond in such sum as it
may fix, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of the
executive director. The commission shall be authorized to fix the compensation
of the executive director, and also the compensation of its other employees,
subject to the approval of the Governor. The commission shall have an office at
such place within the state as it may determine and shall meet at least six
eight times per year.
(2) The commission shall appoint or employ deputies, investigators,
inspectors, agents, security personnel, and other persons as deemed necessary
to administer and effectively enforce the regulation of horseracing , and the
Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act , and sections 9-1201 to 9-1209. Any appointed or
employed personnel shall perform the duties assigned by the commission.
(3) All personnel appointed or employed by the commission shall be bonded
or insured as required by section 11-201. As specified by the commission,
certain personnel shall be vested with the authority and power of a law
enforcement officer to carry out the laws of this state administered by the
commission.
Sec. 3. Section 2-1203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1203 The commission shall have power to prescribe and enforce rules and
regulations governing horseraces and race meetings licensed as provided in
sections 2-1201 to 2-1229 and section 6 of this act and games of chance as
provided in the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act. Such rules and regulations shall
contain criteria to be used by the commission for decisions on approving and
revoking track licenses and setting racing dates.
The commission may revoke or suspend licenses issued to racing industry
participants and may, in lieu of or in addition to such suspension or
revocation, impose a fine in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand
dollars upon a finding that a rule or regulation has been violated by a
licensed racing industry participant. The exact amount of the fine shall be
proportional to the seriousness of the violation and the extent to which the
licensee derived financial gain as a result of the violation.
The commission may delegate to a board of stewards such of the
commission's powers and duties as may be necessary to carry out and effectuate
the purposes of sections 2-1201 to 2-1229 and section 6 of this act.
Any decision or action of such board of stewards may be appealed to the
commission or may be reviewed by the commission on its own initiative. The
board of stewards may impose a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars upon a
finding that a rule or regulation has been violated.
The commission shall remit administrative fines collected under this
section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 4. Section 2-1203.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1203.01 The commission shall:
(1) Enforce all state laws covering horseracing as required by sections
2-1201 to 2-1229 and section 6 of this act and enforce rules and regulations
covering horseracing adopted and promulgated by the commission under the
authority of section 2-1203;
(2) License racetrack enclosures, racing industry participants, race
officials, mutuel employees, concessionaires, and such other persons as deemed
necessary by the commission if the license applicants meet eligibility
standards established by the commission;
(3) Prescribe and enforce security provisions, including, but not limited
to, the restricted access to areas within racetrack track enclosures and
backstretch areas, and prohibitions against misconduct or corrupt practices;
(4) Determine or cause to be determined by chemical testing and analysis
of body fluids whether or not any prohibited substance has been administered to
the winning horse of each race and any other horse selected by the board of
stewards;
(5) Verify the certification of horses registered as being Nebraska-bred
under section 2-1213; and
-2-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
(6) Collect and verify the amount of revenue received by the commission
under section 2-1208.
Sec. 5. Section 2-1203.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1203.02 (1)(a) (1) Any person between sixteen and seventy-five years of
age applying for or holding a license to participate in or be employed at a
horserace meeting licensed by the commission shall be subject to fingerprinting
and a check of his or her criminal history record information maintained by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol. Each
applicant shall furnish to the Nebraska State Patrol a full set of legible
fingerprints to enable a criminal background investigation to be conducted. The
Nebraska State Patrol shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The Nebraska State
Patrol shall issue a report to the commission that includes the information
collected from the national criminal history record information check
concerning the individual. Such requirements shall be Identification Division
of the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of determining whether
the commission has a basis to deny the license application or to suspend,
cancel, or revoke the person's license , except that the commission shall not
require a person to be fingerprinted if such person has been previously
fingerprinted in connection with a license application in this state within the
last five years prior to the application for such license.
(b) Any person between sixteen and seventy-five years of age involved in
the administration or management of a racetrack, including the governing body,
shall be subject to fingerprinting and a check of his or her criminal history
record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation through
the Nebraska State Patrol. Each applicant shall furnish to the Nebraska State
Patrol a full set of legible fingerprints to enable a criminal background
investigation to be conducted. The Nebraska State Patrol shall submit the
fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal
history record check. The Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a report to the
commission that includes the information collected from the national criminal
history record information check concerning the individual Identification
Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(c) The applicant, licensee, or person involved in the administration or
management of a racetrack shall pay the actual cost of any fingerprinting or
check of his or her criminal history record information.
(d) The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to employees of
concessions who do not work in restricted-access areas, admissions employees
whose duties involve only admissions ticket sales and verification or parking
receipts sales and verification, and medical or emergency services personnel
authorized to provide such services at the racetrack.
(2) If the applicant is an individual who is applying for a license to
participate in or be employed at a horserace meeting, the application shall
include the applicant's social security number.
Sec. 6. (1) For purposes of sections 2-1201 to 2-1218, licensed racetrack
enclosure means all real property licensed and utilized for the conduct of a
race meeting, including the racetrack and any grandstand, concession stand,
office, barn, barn area, employee housing facility, parking lot, and additional
area designated by the commission in accordance with the Constitution of
Nebraska and applicable Nebraska law.
(2) The Nebraska State Fair Board, a county fair board, a county
agricultural society for the improvement of agriculture organized under the
County Agricultural Society Act, or a corporation or association of persons
organized and carried on for civic purposes or which conducts a livestock
exposition for the promotion of the livestock or horse-breeding industries of
the state and which does not permit its members to derive personal profit from
its activities by way of dividends or otherwise may apply in a manner
prescribed by the commission for a racetrack enclosure license to operate a
licensed racetrack enclosure along with an application fee of ten thousand
dollars. A racetrack enclosure license shall be valid for a period of three
years. Such license may be renewed in a manner prescribed by the commission,
and such application for renewal shall be accompanied by a fee of ten thousand
dollars.
(3) A racetrack enclosure license issued pursuant to this section for
purposes of operating a licensed racetrack enclosure is separate and distinct
from the license required to conduct horseracing meets issued pursuant to
section 2-1204.
(4) A licensee holding a license to conduct horseracing meets at a
designated place within the state pursuant to section 2-1204 prior to the
effective date of this act shall be deemed to hold a racetrack enclosure
license for such designated place within the state for purposes of this section
and the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act until the commission acts upon the
licensee's application for a racetrack enclosure license under this section.
Sec. 7. Section 2-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1204 (1) The Nebraska State Fair Board, a county fair board, a county
agricultural society for the improvement of agriculture organized under the
County Agricultural Society Act, or a corporation or association of persons
organized and carried on for civic purposes or which conducts a livestock
exposition for the promotion of the livestock or horse-breeding industries of
the state and which does not permit its members to derive personal profit from
its activities by way of dividends or otherwise may apply to the commission for
-3-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
a license to conduct horseracing meets at a designated place within the state.
Such application shall be filed with the executive director of the commission
at least sixty days before the first day of the horserace meeting which such
corporation or association proposes to hold or conduct, shall specify the day
or days when and the exact location where it is proposed to conduct such
racing, and shall be in such form and contain such information as the
commission shall prescribe.
(2) A license to conduct horseracing meets issued pursuant to this section
is separate and distinct from the license required for racetrack enclosures
pursuant to section 6 of this act.
Sec. 8. Section 2-1205, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
2-1205 (1) If the commission is satisfied that its rules and regulations
and all provisions of sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 have been and will be complied
with, it may issue a license to conduct a race or race meeting for a period of
not more than three five years. The license shall set forth the name of the
licensee, the place where the races or race meetings are to be held, and the
time and number of days during which racing may be conducted by such licensee.
Any such license issued shall not be transferable or assignable. The commission
shall have the power to revoke any license issued at any time for good cause
upon reasonable notice and hearing. No license shall be granted to any
corporation or association except upon the express condition that it shall not,
by any lease, contract, understanding, or arrangement of whatever kind or
nature, grant, assign, or turn over to any person, corporation, or association
the operation or management of any racing or race meeting licensed under such
sections or of the parimutuel system of wagering described in section 2-1207 or
in any manner permit any person, corporation, or association other than the
licensee to have any share, percentage, or proportion of the money received for
admissions to the racing or race meeting or from the operation of the
parimutuel system; and any violation of such conditions shall authorize and
require the commission immediately to revoke such license. No licensee shall be
considered in violation of this section with respect to an agreement with an
authorized gaming operator regarding employees and the acceptance of any
parimutuel wager or sports wager pursuant to section 9-1110.
(2)(a) Any racetrack for which a licensee is issued a license to conduct a
race or race meeting under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 which is in existence and
operational as of April 20, 2022, shall:
(i) Hold a minimum of five live racing meet days and fifty live horseraces
annually beginning January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2030; and
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2031, hold a minimum of fifteen live racing meet
days and one hundred twenty live horseraces annually.
(b) Any racetrack for which a licensee is issued a license to conduct a
race or race meeting under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 which is not in existence
and operational until after April 20, 2022, shall:
(i) Hold a minimum of one live racing meet day annually for the first
three years of operation;
(ii) Hold a minimum of five live racing meet days and fifty live
horseraces annually for the fourth year of operation through the seventh year
of operation; and
(iii) Beginning with the eighth year of operation, hold a minimum of
fifteen live racing meet days and one hundred twenty live horseraces annually.
(c) A racetrack that fails to meet the minimum requirements under this
subsection is subject to discipline by the commission, including revocation of
the license issued under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218.
(3) A racetrack for which a licensee is issued a license to conduct a race
or race meeting under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 in existence on November 1,
2020, which is located in the counties of Adams, Dakota, Douglas, Hall,
Lancaster, and Platte, may move such racetrack location to another county in
Nebraska that does not have a racetrack one time only, subject to approval by
the commission as provided in subdivision (27) of section 9-1106, subsequent to
the initial issuance of the market analysis and socioeconomic-impact studies
conducted pursuant to section 9-1106.
Sec. 9. Section 2-1223, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1223 Those corporations or associations eligible for licenses to conduct
horseracing meets by the parimutuel method as defined in section 2-1204, shall
be exempt from the provisions of the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property
Act.
Sec. 10. Section 2-1225, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1225 For purposes of sections 2-1207 and 2-1224 to 2-1229, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Commission means shall mean the State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(2) Interstate simulcast means shall mean parimutuel wagering at any
licensed racetrack within the state on the results of any horserace conducted
outside the state;
(3) Licensed horserace meeting includes shall include, but is not be
limited to, licensed racetrack enclosures racetracks at which simulcasts or
interstate simulcasts are conducted;
(4) Operator means shall mean any licensee issued a license under sections
2-1201 to 2-1223 operating a simulcast facility in accordance with sections
2-1224 to 2-1229;
(5) Receiving track means shall mean any track which displays a simulcast
-4-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
which originates from another track or which conducts interstate simulcasts;
(6) Sending track means shall mean any track from which a simulcast or
interstate simulcast originates;
(7) Simulcast means shall mean the telecast of live audio and visual
signals of any horserace conducted in the state for the purpose of parimutuel
wagering;
(8) Simulcast facility means shall mean a facility within the state which
is authorized to display simulcasts for parimutuel wagering purposes under
sections 2-1224 to 2-1227 or to conduct interstate simulcasts under sections
2-1228 and 2-1229; and
(9) Track means shall mean the grounds within the licensed racetrack
enclosure where or enclosures within which horseraces are conducted by
licensees authorized to conduct such races in accordance with sections 2-1201
to 2-1223.
Sec. 11. Section 2-1244, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1244 For purposes of sections 2-1243 to 2-1246, horseracing industry
participant shall mean an individual who currently holds a valid license for
purposes of conducting horseracing from the State Racing and Gaming Commission
and who owns, trains, cares for, or rides horses stabled at a licensed
Nebraska-licensed racetrack enclosure in this state for the purpose of
horseracing at the live race meeting at such racetrack.
Sec. 12. Section 2-1245, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
2-1245 (1) A horseracing industry participant shall be entitled to
reasonable treatment from those licensed to conduct thoroughbred race meets.
(2) Private property belonging to a horseracing industry participant at a
racetrack facility shall not unlawfully be converted, seized, damaged, or
destroyed by racetrack employees or agents without compensation.
(3) A horseracing industry participant shall not be deemed to forfeit or
waive any right to privacy without reasonable cause guaranteed by law by virtue
of being licensed by the state, by entry upon licensed racetrack enclosures
horseracing facilities, or by engaging in the sport of horseracing in this
state.
(4) A horseracing industry participant may not be excluded from the
grounds of any licensed racetrack enclosure by track management without a
hearing by the stewards at such racetrack unless there are reasonable grounds
to believe such participant has committed a felony or is posing a physical
danger to himself or herself, to others, or to animals in his or her care or
his or her physical presence will bring immediate harm to horseracing. Such
hearing shall be held as soon as practicable and shall be given first priority
and precedence by the stewards. This subsection shall not apply to the
allocation of stalls pursuant to an agreement between the horseracing industry
participant and the licensed racetrack.
(5) A horseracing industry participant shall be free from unreasonable
searches and seizures of his or her person without probable cause and shall be
free from unreasonable searches and seizures of his or her housing, vehicle,
papers, and effects.
(6) If a horseracing industry participant has been charged with a
violation of a rule of racing which involves a substantial risk of loss or
suspension of his or her license or which involves a criminal penalty, he or
she shall be entitled to the following protections as a matter of right:
(a) To remain silent;
(b) To the benefit of counsel, including the opportunity to confer with
counsel in preparation of a defense;
(c) To a speedy and public hearing;
(d) To present evidence and to testify in person at his or her hearing;
(e) To cross-examine the witnesses who testify against him or her; and
(f) To have prospective witnesses excluded from the hearing room during
the hearing.
Nothing in this section shall prevent a horseracing industry participant
from knowingly waiving any rights afforded under this subsection.
(7) A horseracing industry participant shall not be required to waive his
or her constitutional rights nor the rights granted pursuant to sections 2-1243
to 2-1246 as a condition of pursuing a livelihood in this state or at any
licensed thoroughbred horseracing facility.
Sec. 13. Section 9-1101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-1101 Sections 9-1101 to 9-1118 and sections 9-1201 to 9-1209 shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act.
Sec. 14. Section 9-1103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
9-1103 For purposes of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act:
(1) Authorized gaming operator means a person or entity licensed pursuant
to the act to operate games of chance within a licensed racetrack enclosure;
(2) Authorized gaming operator license means a license to operate games of
chance as an authorized gaming operator at a licensed racetrack enclosure;
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of this
subdivision, authorized sporting event means a professional sporting event, a
collegiate sporting event, an international sporting event, a professional
motor race event, a professional sports draft, an individual sports award, an
electronic sport, or a simulated game; and
(b) Authorized sporting event does not include an instate collegiate
-5-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
sporting event in which an instate collegiate or university team is a
participant, a parimutuel wager, a fantasy sports contest, a minor league
sporting event, a sporting event at the high school level or below regardless
of the age of any individual participant, or any sporting event excluded by the
commission;
(4) Collegiate sporting event means an athletic event or competition of an
intercollegiate sport played at the collegiate level for which eligibility
requirements for participation by a student athlete are established by a
national association for the promotion or regulation of collegiate athletics;
(5) Commission means the State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(6) Designated sports wagering area means an area, as approved by the
commission, in which sports wagering is conducted;
(7) Dollar amount collected means the total dollar amount wagered by
players of games of chance less the total dollar amount returned to such
players as prizes;
(8) (7) Game of chance means any game which has the elements of chance,
prize, and consideration, including any wager on a slot machine, table game,
counter game, or card game, a keno lottery conducted in accordance with the
Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, or sports wagering. Game of chance does
not include any game the operation of which is prohibited at a casino by
federal law;
(9) (8) Gaming device means an electronic, mechanical, or other device
which plays a game of chance when activated by a player using currency, a
token, or other item of value;
(10) Gross gaming revenue means the dollar amount collected by an
authorized gaming operator from operation of all games of chance within a
licensed racetrack enclosure as computed pursuant to applicable statutes,
rules, and regulations less the total of (a) all federal taxes, other than
income taxes, imposed on the operation of such games of chance and (b) the
amount provided to players by an authorized gaming operator as promotional
gaming credits, but only to the extent such promotional gaming credits are
redeemed by players to play one or more games of chance being operated by the
authorized gaming operator;
(11) (9) International sporting event means an international team or
individual sporting event governed by an international sports federation or
sports governing body, including sporting events governed by the International
Olympic Committee and the International Federation of Association Football;
(12) (10) Licensed racetrack enclosure has the same meaning as in section
6 of this act; means all real property licensed and utilized for the conduct of
a race meeting, including the racetrack and any grandstand, concession stand,
office, barn, barn area, employee housing facility, parking lot, and additional
area designated by the commission in accordance with the Constitution of
Nebraska and applicable Nebraska law;
(13) (11) Limited gaming device means an electronic gaming device which
(a) offers games of chance, (b) does not dispense currency, tokens, or other
items of value, and (c) does not have a cash winnings hopper, mechanical or
simulated spinning reel, or side handle;
(14) (12) Prohibited participant means any individual whose participation
may undermine the integrity of the wagering or the sporting event or any person
who is prohibited from sports wagering for other good cause shown as determined
by the commission, including, but not limited to: (a) Any individual placing a
wager as an agent or proxy; (b) any person who is an athlete, a coach, a
referee, or a player in any sporting event overseen by the sports governing
body of such person based on publicly available information; (c) a person who
holds a paid position of authority or influence sufficient to exert influence
over the participants in a sporting event, including, but not limited to, any
coach, manager, handler, or athletic trainer, or a person with access to
certain types of exclusive information, on any sporting event overseen by the
sports governing body of such person based on publicly available information;
or (d) a person identified as prohibited from sports wagering by any list
provided by a sports governing body to the commission;
(15) Promotional gaming credit means a credit, token, or other item of
value provided by an authorized gaming operator to a player for the purpose of
enabling the player to play a game of chance;
(16) (13) Racing license means a license issued for a licensed racetrack
enclosure by the commission; and
(17) (14) Sports wagering means the acceptance of wagers on an authorized
sporting event by any system of wagering as authorized by the commission.
Sports wagering does not include (a) placing a wager on the performance or
nonperformance of any individual athlete participating in a single game or
match of a collegiate sporting event in which a collegiate team from this state
is participating, (b) placing an in-game wager on any game or match of a
collegiate sporting event in which a collegiate team from this state is
participating, (c) placing a wager on the performance or nonperformance of any
individual athlete under eighteen years of age participating in a professional
or international sporting event, or (d) placing a wager on the performance of
athletes in an individual sporting event excluded by the commission.
Sec. 15. Section 9-1106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
9-1106 The commission shall:
(1) License and regulate authorized gaming operators for the operation of
all games of chance authorized pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act,
including adopting, promulgating, and enforcing rules and regulations governing
-6-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
such authorized gaming operators consistent with the act;
(2) Regulate the operation of games of chance in order to prevent and
eliminate corrupt practices and fraudulent behavior, and thereby promote
integrity, security, and honest administration in, and accurate accounting of,
the operation of games of chance which are subject to the act;
(3) Establish criteria to license applicants for authorized gaming
operator licenses and all other types of gaming licenses for other positions
and functions incident to the operation of games of chance, including adopting,
promulgating, and enforcing rules, regulations, and eligibility standards for
such authorized gaming operator licenses, gaming licenses, and positions and
functions incident to the operation of games of chance;
(4) Charge fees for applications for licenses and for the issuance of
authorized gaming operator licenses and all other types of gaming licenses to
successful applicants which shall be payable to the commission;
(5) Charge fees to authorized gaming operators in an amount necessary to
offset the cost of oversight and regulatory services to be provided which shall
be payable to the commission;
(6) Impose a one-time authorized gaming operator license fee of five
million dollars on each authorized gaming operator for each licensed racetrack
enclosure payable to the commission. The license fee may be paid over a period
of five years with one million dollars due at the time the license is issued
and one million dollars due each year thereafter until the initial five-
million-dollar license fee is paid in full;
(7) Grant, deny, revoke, and suspend authorized gaming operator licenses
and all other types of gaming licenses based upon reasonable criteria and
procedures established by the commission to facilitate the integrity,
productivity, and lawful conduct of gaming within the state;
(8) Grant or deny for cause applications for authorized gaming operator
licenses of not less than twenty years in duration, subject to an annual review
by the commission and receipt by the commission of a fifty-thousand-dollar
annual review fee, with no more than one such authorized gaming operator
license granted for any licensed racetrack enclosure within the state;
(9) Conduct background investigations of applicants for authorized gaming
operator licenses and all other types of gaming licenses;
(10) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the standards of
manufacture of gaming equipment;
(11) Inspect the operation of any authorized gaming operator conducting
games of chance for the purpose of certifying the revenue thereof and receiving
complaints from the public;
(12) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses or the production of
any records, books, memoranda, documents, or other papers or things at or prior
to any hearing as is necessary to enable the commission to effectively
discharge its duties;
(13) Administer oaths or affirmations as necessary to carry out the act;
(14) Have the authority to impose, subject to judicial review, appropriate
administrative fines and penalties for each violation of the act or any rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act in an amount not to
exceed:
(a) For any licensed racetrack enclosure with an authorized gaming
operator operating games of chance for one year or less, fifty thousand dollars
per violation; or
(b) For any licensed racetrack enclosure with an authorized gaming
operator operating games of chance for more than one year, three times the
highest daily amount of gross receipts derived from wagering on games of chance
during the twelve months preceding the violation at such licensed racetrack
enclosure gaming facility per violation;
(15) Collect and remit administrative fines and penalties collected under
this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article
VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska;
(16) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for any gaming taxes
assessed to authorized gaming operators;
(17) Collect and account for any gaming taxes assessed to authorized
gaming operators and remit such taxes to the State Treasurer or county
treasurer as required by Nebraska law;
(18) Promote treatment of gaming-related behavioral disorders;
(19) Establish procedures for the governance of the commission;
(20) Acquire necessary offices, facilities, counsel, and staff;
(21) Establish procedures for an applicant for a staff position to
disclose conflicts of interest as part of the application for employment;
(22) Establish a process to allow a person to be voluntarily excluded from
wagering in any game of chance under the act in accordance with section 9-1118;
(23) Remit all license and application fees collected under the Nebraska
Racetrack Gaming Act to the State Treasurer for credit to the Racing and Gaming
Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund;
(24) Conduct or cause to be conducted a statewide horseracing market
analysis to study the racing market as it currently exists across the state and
within the locations in Nebraska of the racetracks in Adams, Dakota, Douglas,
Hall, Lancaster, and Platte counties as of the date of the market analysis.
Such market analysis shall be completed as soon as practicable but not later
than January 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter and shall be submitted
electronically to the General Affairs Committee of the Legislature and to the
Governor. Such market analysis shall examine the market potential and make
recommendations involving:
-7-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
(a) The number of live racing days per track, number of races run, and
number of horses that should be entered per race;
(b) The number of Nebraska-bred horses available in the market for running
races, including foals dropped in the state for the past three years at the
time of the market analysis;
(c) The circuit scheduled in the state and if any overlapping dates would
be beneficial to the circuit and market as a whole;
(d) The total number of horses available for the total annual schedule,
with separate analysis for thoroughbred races and quarterhorse races;
(e) The purse money available per race and per track;
(f) The strength of the potential and ongoing simulcast market;
(g) The staffing patterns and problems that exist at each track, including
unfilled positions;
(h) The positive and negative effects, including financial, on each
existing racetrack at the time of the market analysis in the event the
commission approves a new racetrack application;
(i) The potential to attract new owners and horses from other states;
(j) The market potential for expansion at each licensed racetrack
enclosure to the live race meet days and the number of live horseraces required
by section 2-1205, and the room for expansion, if any, for additional licensed
racetrack enclosures into the market in Nebraska and the locations most
suitable for such expansion; and
(k) Any other data and analysis required by the commission;
(25) Conduct or cause to be conducted a statewide casino gaming market
analysis study across the state and within each location of a racetrack in
Adams, Dakota, Douglas, Hall, Lancaster, and Platte counties. Such market
analysis study shall be completed as soon as practicable but not later than
January 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter and shall be submitted
electronically to the General Affairs Committee of the Legislature and to the
Governor. The market analysis study shall include:
(a) A comprehensive assessment of the potential casino gaming market
conditions;
(b) An evaluation of the effects on the Nebraska market from competitive
casino gaming locations outside of the state;
(c) Information identifying underperforming or underserved markets within
Nebraska;
(d) A comprehensive study of potential casino gaming revenue in Nebraska;
and
(e) Any other data and analysis required by the commission;
(26) Conduct or cause to be conducted a statewide socioeconomic-impact
study of horseracing and casino gaming across the state and at each licensed
racetrack enclosure and gaming facility in Adams, Dakota, Douglas, Hall,
Lancaster, and Platte counties. Such socioeconomic-impact study shall be
completed as soon as practicable but not later than January 1, 2025, and shall
be submitted electronically to the General Affairs Committee of the Legislature
and to the Governor. The study shall include:
(a) Information on financial and societal impacts of horseracing and
casino gaming, including crime and local businesses;
(b) An analysis of problem gambling within the state; and
(c) A comparison of the economy of counties which contain a licensed
racetrack enclosure operating games of chance and counties which do not contain
such a licensed racetrack enclosure as of the date of the study, which
comparison shall include:
(i) The population of such counties;
(ii) Jobs created by each licensed racetrack enclosure operating games of
chance in such counties;
(iii) Unemployment rates in such counties;
(iv) Information on family and household income in such counties;
(v) Retail sales in such counties;
(vi) Property values in such counties;
(vii) An analysis of the impact on community services, including police
protection expenditures, fire protection expenditures, road, bridge, and
sidewalk expenditures, and capital project expenditures in such counties;
(viii) Impact on community health in such counties;
(ix) Divorce rates in such counties;
(x) Information on available education and education levels in such
counties;
(xi) Life expectancy in such counties;
(xii) Homelessness in such counties; and
(xiii) Any other data and analysis required by the commission;
(27) Approve or deny an application for any licensed racetrack enclosure
which is not in existence or operational as of April 20, 2022, or any licensed
racetrack enclosure in existence and operational as of November 1, 2020, that
applies to move such licensed racetrack enclosure pursuant to section 2-1205,
on the basis of the placement and location of such licensed racetrack enclosure
and based on the market as it exists as of the most recent issuance of the
statewide horseracing market analysis, statewide casino gaming market analysis,
and statewide socioeconomic-impact studies conducted by the commission pursuant
to this section. The commission shall deny a licensed racetrack enclosure or
gaming operator license application if it finds that approval of such
application in such placement and location would be detrimental to the racing
or gaming market that exists across the state based on the most recent
statewide horseracing market analysis, statewide casino gaming market analysis,
-8-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
and statewide socioeconomic-impact studies;
(28) Do all things necessary and proper to carry out its powers and duties
under the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, including the adoption and
promulgation of rules and regulations and such other actions as permitted by
the Administrative Procedure Act;
(29) Recommend to the Governor and to the General Affairs Committee of the
Legislature amendments to all laws administered by the commission; and
(30) As appropriate and as recommended by the executive director of the
commission, delegate to an adjudication subcommittee of the commission those
powers and duties of the commission as necessary to carry out and effectuate
the purposes of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act and investigate and respond
to violations of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act. The adjudication
subcommittee staff shall be appointed by the executive director. No person may
be appointed to the adjudication subcommittee if such person is involved in the
investigation of any violation being heard or investigated by the subcommittee.
Any action of the adjudication subcommittee may be appealed to the commission
or may be reviewed by the commission on its own initiative. The adjudication
subcommittee may impose a fine, consistent with the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming
Act, not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars, upon a finding that the act or any
rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under the act has been violated. The
commission shall remit any fines collected under this subdivision to the State
Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the
Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 16. Section 9-1107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
9-1107 (1) The Racing and Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund is
created. The fund shall consist of all license, application, and other fees
collected under the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act and all license fees and
gross tax receipts collected by the commission under sections 2-1203,
2-1203.01, and 2-1208 relating to horseracing but shall not include taxes
collected pursuant to section 2-1208.01. The fund shall be used for
administration of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act and the administration of
horseracing pursuant to Chapter 2, article 12. Any money in the Racing and
Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1,
2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be
credited to the General Fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Racing and Gaming
Commission's Racing Cash Fund on the effective date of this act to the
Racetrack Gaming Fund.
Sec. 17. Section 9-1108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-1108 Any person applying for a gaming operator license pursuant to the
Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act shall be subject to fingerprinting and a check of
such person's criminal history record information maintained by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol. Each applicant shall
furnish to the Nebraska State Patrol a full set of legible fingerprints to
enable a criminal background investigation to be conducted. The Nebraska State
Patrol shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
a national criminal history record check. The Nebraska State Patrol shall issue
a report to the commission that includes the information collected from the
national criminal history record information check concerning the individual.
Such requirements shall be Identification Division of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for the purpose of determining whether the commission has a basis
to deny the license application or to suspend, cancel, or revoke the person's
license. The applicant shall pay the actual cost of any fingerprinting or check
of such person's criminal history record information.
Sec. 18. Section 9-1203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-1203 An annual gaming tax is imposed on gross gaming revenue generated
by authorized gaming operators within licensed racetrack enclosures from the
operation of all games of chance equal to twenty percent of such gross gaming
revenue. The gaming commission shall collect the tax and shall account for and
remit such tax as set forth by law.
Sec. 19. Section 9-1205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-1205 Every authorized gaming operator subject to taxation as set forth
in section 9-1203 sections 9-1201 to 9-1209 shall pay such tax by the fifteenth
of each month to the gaming commission and make report thereof to the gaming
commission under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the gaming
commission.
Sec. 20. Section 9-1206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-1206 If the tax provided for in section 9-1203 sections 9-1201 to 9-1209
is not paid within such time as provided in section 9-1205 or as may be
prescribed for payment thereof by rules and regulations prescribed by the
gaming commission, the same shall become delinquent and a penalty of ten
percent shall be added thereto, together with interest at the rate specified in
section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, until paid.
Sec. 21. Section 9-1207, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-1207 Any authorized gaming operator that willfully fails, neglects, or
-9-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
refuses to make any report required by section 9-1205 sections 9-1201 to
9-1209, or by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under such section
sections 9-1201 to 9-1209, or that knowingly makes any false statement in any
such report, is guilty of a Class IV felony.
Sec. 22. Section 9-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-1208 If any section or provision of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act
sections 9-1201 to 9-1208 is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to
be unconstitutional or otherwise void or invalid for any reason, such
determination shall not affect the validity of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming
Act sections 9-1201 to 9-1208 as a whole or any part thereof, other than the
part so determined to be unconstitutional or otherwise void or invalid.
Sec. 23. Section 9-1209, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
9-1209 (1) If any person liable to pay any tax or fee under the Nebraska
Racetrack Gaming Act or sections 9-1201 to 9-1208 neglects or refuses to pay
such tax or fee after demand, the amount of such tax or fee, including any
interest, penalty, and additions to such tax, and such additional costs that
may accrue, shall be a lien in favor of the gaming commission upon all property
and rights to property, whether real or personal, then owned by such person or
acquired by such person thereafter and prior to the expiration of the lien.
Unless another date is specifically provided by law, such lien shall arise at
the time of the assessment and shall remain in effect: (a) For three years from
the time of the assessment or one year after the expiration of an agreement
between the gaming commission and a taxpayer for payment of tax which is due,
whichever is later, if the notice of lien is not filed for record in the office
of the appropriate filing officer; (b) for ten years from the time of filing
for record in the office of the appropriate filing officer; or (c) until such
amounts have been paid or a judgment against such person arising out of such
liability has been satisfied or has become unenforceable by reason of lapse of
time, unless a continuation statement is filed prior to the lapse.
(2)(a) The gaming commission may present for filing or file for record in
the office of the appropriate filing officer a notice of lien specifying the
year the tax was due, the tax program, and the amount of the tax and any
interest, penalty, or addition to such tax that are due. Such notice shall be
filed for record in the office of the appropriate filing officer within three
years after the time of assessment or within one year after the expiration of
an agreement between the gaming commission and a taxpayer for payment of tax
which is due, whichever is later. Such notice shall contain the name and last-
known address of the taxpayer, the last four digits of the taxpayer's social
security number or federal identification number, the gaming commission's
serial number, and a statement to the effect that the gaming commission has
complied with all provisions of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act and sections
9-1201 to 9-1208 in the determination of the amount of the tax and any
interest, penalty, and addition to such tax required to be paid.
(b) If the assets of the taxpayer are in the control or custody of the
court in any proceeding before any court of the United States or of any state
or the District of Columbia, before the end of the time period in subdivision
(2)(a) of this section, the notice shall be filed for record within the time
period or within six months after the assets are released by the court,
whichever is later.
(3)(a) A lien imposed upon real property pursuant to the Uniform State Tax
Lien Registration and Enforcement Act shall be valid against any subsequent
creditor when notice of such lien and the amount due has been presented for
filing by the gaming commission in the office of the Secretary of State and
filed in the office of the register of deeds. A lien imposed upon personal
property pursuant to the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement
Act shall be valid against any subsequent creditor when notice of such lien and
the amount due has been filed by the gaming commission in the office of the
Secretary of State.
(b) In the case of any prior mortgage on real property or secured
transaction covering personal property so written as to secure a present debt
and future advances, the lien provided in this section, when notice thereof has
been filed in the office of the appropriate filing officer, shall be subject to
such prior lien unless the gaming commission has notified the lienholder in
writing of the recording of such tax lien, in which case the lien of any
indebtedness thereafter created under such mortgage or secured transaction
shall be junior to the lien provided for in this section.
(4) The lien may, within ten years from the date of filing for record of
the notice of lien in the office of the appropriate filing officer, be extended
by filing for record a continuation statement. Upon timely filing of the
continuation statement, the effectiveness of the original notice shall be
continued for ten years after the last date to which the filing was effective.
After such period the notice shall lapse in the manner prescribed in subsection
(1) of this section unless another continuation statement is filed prior to
such lapse.
(5) When a termination statement of any tax lien issued by the gaming
commission is filed in the office where the notice of lien is filed, the
appropriate filing officer shall enter such statement with the date of filing
in the state tax lien index where notice of the lien so terminated is entered
and shall file the termination statement with the notice of the lien.
(6) The gaming commission may at any time, upon request of any party
involved, release from a lien all or any portion of the property subject to any
-10-

LB357 LB357
2025 2025
lien provided for in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement
Act or subordinate a lien to other liens and encumbrances if the gaming
commission determines that (a) the tax amount and any interest, penalties, and
additions to such tax have been paid or secured sufficiently by a lien on other
property, (b) the lien has become legally unenforceable, (c) a surety bond or
other satisfactory security has been posted, deposited, or pledged with the
gaming commission in an amount sufficient to secure the payment of such taxes
and any interest, penalties, and additions to such taxes, or (d) the release,
partial release, or subordination of the lien will not jeopardize the
collection of such taxes and any interest, penalties, and additions to such
taxes.
(7) A certificate by the gaming commission stating that any property has
been released from the lien or the lien has been subordinated to other liens
and encumbrances shall be conclusive evidence that the property has in fact
been released or the lien has been subordinated pursuant to the certificate.
Sec. 24. Section 25-21,252, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-21,252 (1) Sections 25-21,249 to 25-21,253 shall not apply to the
horseracing industry as regulated in sections 2-1201 to 2-1229 and section 6 of
this act.
(2) Nothing in section 25-21,251 prevents or limits the liability of an
equine activity sponsor, an equine professional, or any other person if the
equine activity sponsor, equine professional, or person:
(a) Provided the equipment or tack and the equipment or tack caused the
injury because the equine activity sponsor or professional failed to reasonably
and prudently inspect or maintain the equipment or tack;
(b) Provided the equine and failed to make reasonable and prudent efforts
to determine the ability of the participant to engage safely in the equine
activity and determine the ability of the participant to safely manage the
particular equine based on the participant's representations of his or her
ability;
(c) Owns, leases, rents, or otherwise is in lawful possession and control
of the land or facilities upon which the participant sustained injuries or
death because of a dangerous latent condition which was known or should have
been known to the equine activity sponsor, equine professional, or person and
for which warning signs were not conspicuously posted;
(d) Commits an act or omission which a reasonable, prudent person would
not have done or omitted under the same or similar circumstances or which
constitutes willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the participant and
that act or omission was a proximate cause of the injury; or
(e) Intentionally injures the participant.
(3) Nothing in section 25-21,251 prevents or limits the liability of an
equine activity sponsor or an equine professional under product liability laws.
Sec. 25. Original sections 2-1203, 2-1203.01, 2-1203.02, 2-1204, 2-1223,
2-1225, 2-1244, 2-1245, 9-1101, 9-1108, 9-1203, 9-1205, 9-1206, 9-1207, 9-1208,
9-1209, and 25-21,252, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
2-1201, 2-1202, 2-1205, 9-1103, 9-1106, and 9-1107, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 26. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 2-1222
and 9-1202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-11-